Washington statutes.
RCW 31.35.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Agricultural lender" means a Washington corporation incorporated under Title 23B or 24 RCW and qualified as such under this chapter and the jurisdiction of the federal government agency sponsoring the loan guaranty program.

(2) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.

(3) "Loan guaranty program" means the farmers home administration loan guaranty program, or any other government program for which the agricultural lender is eligible and which has as its function the provision, facilitation, or financing of agricultural business operations.

[ 1994 c 92 s 252; 1990 c 134 s 2.]